Hawaii statutes.
[§340F-9] Injunctions and civil
penalty. Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or any
rules, regulations, criterion, procedure, or certificate issued hereunder may,
in a legal action commenced by the board;

(1) Be enjoined from continuing such violation; and

(2) Be subject to a civil penalty of not more than
$25,000 a day for each day of continuing violation. [L 1991, c 273, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next